Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-521
Class IV school district; board of education; officers; rules and regulations; taking of testimony.

The board of education of a Class IV school district has power to select its own officers and make rules and regulations necessary to carry out the board's legal duties. The board of education, or any committee of the members of the board, has power to compel the attendance of witnesses for the investigation of matters that may come before them. The presiding officer of the board of education or the chairperson of such committee may administer the requisite oaths, and such board or committee has the same authority to compel the giving of testimony as is conferred on courts of justice.

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 211, p. 760;

R.S.1943, (1971), § 79-524;

Laws 1971, LB 450, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-907;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 274.